Maryland, session 2026, SB0593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–402.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CARDIOVASCULAR PRESCREENING” MEANS A SET OF
TESTS AND EXAMINATIONS DESIGNED TO ASSESS AN INDIVIDUAL’S HEART HEALTH,
IDENTIFY RISK FACTORS FOR HEART DISEASE, AND DETECT ANY UNDERLYING
CARDIOVASCULAR ABNORMALITIES BEFORE SYMPTOMS APPEAR, INCLUDING:
(1) A TARGETED PERSONAL AND FAMILY HISTORY; AND
(2) A PHYSICAL EXAMINATION BASED ON NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED,
EVIDENCE–BASED GUIDELINES RECOMMENDED BY ORGANIZATIONS FOCUSED ON
CARDIOVASCULAR CARE IN PEDIATRIC POPULATIONS.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO PUBLIC SCHOOLS AND NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS
THAT HOLD A CERTIFICATE OF APPROVAL ISSUED BY THE STATE BOARD UNDER §
2–206 OF THIS ARTICLE THAT REQUIRES STUDENTS TO RECEIVE A PHYSICAL
EXAMINATION DETERMINING PHYSICAL FITNESS TO PARTICIPATE IN
INTERSCHOLASTIC SPORTS.
(C) A PHYSICAL EXAMINATION OF A STUDENT USED TO DETERMINE THE
STUDENT’S PHYSICAL FITNESS TO PARTICIPATE IN INTERSCHOLASTIC SPORTS,
INCLUDING A TRY–OUT, PRACTICE, OR CONTEST OF A SCHOOL TEAM, SHALL
INCLUDE A CARDIOVASCULAR PRESCREENING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION
BEFORE THE STUDENT PARTICIPATES IN AN INTERSCHOLASTIC SPORT.
(D) (1) (I) BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, A QUALIFIED
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER WHO PERFORMS PHYSICAL EXAMINATIONS UNDER § 7–402
OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR STUDENTS PARTICIPATING IN INTERSCHOLASTIC SPORTS OR
FOR A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL STUDENT, SHALL INCLUDE A CARDIOVASCULAR
PRESCREENING AS A PART OF THE EXAMINATION.

SENATE BILL 593 3
(II) A CARDIOVASCULAR PRESCREENING MAY NOT BE
CONDUCTED EARLIER THAN THE 90–DAY PERIOD BEFORE THE FIRST DAY OF THE
SCHOOL YEAR IN WHICH THE STUDENT INTENDS TO PARTICIPATE IN
INTERSCHOLASTIC SPORTS.
(2) IF A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER DETERMINES THAT A STUDENT’S
CARDIOVASCULAR PRESCREENING HAS A POSITIVE FINDING, THE HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER SHOULD DETERMINE WHETHER A REFERRAL TO A CARDIOLOGIST FOR
FURTHER EVALUATION AND TESTING IS NECESSARY.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, SHALL DEVELOP GUIDELINES TO INCREASE HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER KNOWLEDGE AND AWARENESS OF CARDIOVASCULAR
PRESCREENING FOR CHILDREN PARTICIPATING IN YOUTH SPORTS, INCLUDING
POLICIES, PROGRAMS, TRAINING, AND CONTINUING EDUCATION ON:
(1) HOW TO COMPLETE A CARDIOVASCULAR PRESCREENING,
INCLUDING COLLECTING A FAMILY HISTORY AND PERSONAL REPORTS OF
SYMPTOMS;
(2) IDENTIFYING EARLY SIGNS OF CARDIAC ARREST THROUGH
PHYSICAL EXAMINATION; AND
(3) REFERRAL PROCEDURES FOR POSITIVE FINDINGS.
(F) (1) BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH PUBLIC
SCHOOL SHALL REPORT TO THE COUNTY BOARD OR COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT
THE TOTAL NUMBER OF STUDENTS WHO:
(I) HAD A PHYSICAL EXAMINATION TO PARTICIPATE IN
INTERSCHOLASTIC SPORTS;
(II) HAD A PHYSICAL EXAMINATION THAT INCLUDED A
CARDIOVASCULAR PRESCREENING TO PARTICIPATE IN INTERSCHOLASTIC SPORTS;
AND
(III) WERE GIVEN A REFERRAL TO A CARDIOLOGIST FOR
FURTHER EVALUATION AND TESTING RESULTING FROM A CARDIOVASCULAR
PRESCREENING.
(2) THE COUNTY BOARD OR COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT SHALL
REPORT THE INFORMATION OBTAINED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION

SENATE BILL 593
TO THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH BY THE DATE ESTABLISHED THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.
(G) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 EACH YEAR, THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH SHALL PUBLISH A REPORT ON ITS WEBSITE:
(1) LISTING THE TOTAL NUMBER OF STUDENTS WHO:
(I) HAD A PHYSICAL EXAMINATION TO PARTICIPATE IN
INTERSCHOLASTIC SPORTS;
(II) HAD A PHYSICAL EXAMINATION THAT INCLUDED A
CARDIOVASCULAR PRESCREENING TO PARTICIPATE IN INTERSCHOLASTIC SPORTS;
AND
(III) WERE GIVEN A REFERRAL TO A CARDIOLOGIST FOR
FURTHER EVALUATION AND TESTING RESULTING FROM A CARDIOVASCULAR
PRESCREENING; AND
(2) ANALYZING THE OUTCOMES OF THE CARDIOVASCULAR
PRESCREENING REQUIREMENTS, INCLUDING UTILIZATION AND UPTAKE BY
CLINICIANS, THE PROPORTION OF POSITIVE SCREENINGS, AND RECOMMENDATIONS
FOR ANY ADDITIONAL DIAGNOSTIC STUDIES.
(H) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
7–436.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Athletic activity” means:
1. Interscholastic athletics;
2. An athletic contest or competition that is sponsored by or
associated with a school; and
3. Practices and scrimmages.
(ii) “Athletic activity” includes cheerleading and sports sponsored by
school–affiliated organizations.

SENATE BILL 593 5
(3) “Sudden cardiac arrest” means a condition in which the heart suddenly
and unexpectedly stops beating.
(4) “Youth sports program” means a program organized for recreational
athletic competition or instruction for participants who are under the age of 19 years.
(b) Nothing in this section may be construed to create, establish, expand, reduce,
contract, or eliminate any civil liability on the part of a county board employee, school
employee, or youth sports program volunteer.
(c) (1) The Department shall develop policies and implement a program to
provide awareness to coaches, school personnel, students, and the parents or guardians of
students, in collaboration with the Maryland Department of Health, each county board, the
Maryland Public Secondary Schools Athletic Association, the Maryland Athletic Trainers’
Association, Parent Heart Watch, and licensed health care providers who treat heart
issues, on:
(i) The nature and warning signs of sudden cardiac arrest, including
fainting, difficulty breathing, chest pains, dizziness, and abnormal heart rate; and
(ii) The risks associated with continuing to play or practice after
experiencing a symptom of sudden cardiac arrest.
(2) The program shall include a process to verify that a coach has received
information on the program developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) (i) Before a student enrolled in a public school system in the State
may participate in an authorized athletic activity, the county board shall provide a sudden
cardiac arrest symptoms and warning signs information sheet to the student and a parent
or guardian of the student.
(ii) The student and the parent or guardian of the student shall sign
a statement acknowledging receipt of the information sheet.
(iii) The Department shall create the information sheet and
acknowledgment statement required under this paragraph.
(4) The Department may use materials available from the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention, Parent Heart Watch, Sudden Arrhythmia Death
Syndromes Foundation, or any other appropriate entity to carry out the requirements of
this subsection.
(d) A public school may hold an informational meeting before the start of each
athletic season regarding the symptoms and warning signs of sudden cardiac arrest.
(e) (1) Before an individual participates in an authorized athletic activity on
school property, the county board shall provide, or require that a third party provide:

SENATE BILL 593
(i) Information on sudden cardiac arrest to the individual and, if
applicable, a parent or guardian of the individual; and
(ii) Notice that acknowledgment of the receipt of the information by
the individual and, if applicable, the parent or guardian of the individual, is required.
(2) The information required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
be in the form of:
(i) A separate information sheet; or
(ii) A notice on the registration form for a youth sports program
stating that information on sudden cardiac arrest is available, including directions on how
to receive the information electronically.
(3) The individual and, if applicable, the parent or guardian of the
individual shall:
(i) Acknowledge receipt of the information by:
1. Signature;
2. Checking an acknowledgment box on the registration
form; or
3. Another method of written or electronic acknowledgment;
and
(ii) Return the acknowledgment to the county board or third party.
(f) (1) A youth sports program that uses a public school facility shall provide
annually to the county board or the board’s agent a statement of intent to comply for all its
athletic activities with the requirements of subsection (e) of this section.
(2) A youth sports program that does not use a public school facility is
encouraged to follow the guidelines of this section.
(3) A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT HOLDS A CERTIFICATE OF APPROVAL
ISSUED BY THE STATE BOARD UNDER § 2–206 OF THIS ARTICLE SHALL DEVELOP
POLICIES AND PROGRAMS TO IMPLEMENT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION
FOR ITS STUDENT ATHLETIC ACTIVITIES.
Article – Health – General
14–501.

SENATE BILL 593 7
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Sudden cardiac arrest” means a condition in which the heart suddenly
and unexpectedly stops beating.
(4) “Youth athlete” means an individual who participates in an athletic
activity in association with a youth sports program conducted:
(i) At a public school facility; [or]
(ii) AT A FACILITY OF A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT HOLDS A
CERTIFICATE OF APPROVAL ISSUED BY THE STATE BOARD UNDER § 2–206 OF THE
EDUCATION ARTICLE; OR
(III) By a recreational athletic organization.
(5) “Youth sports program” means a program organized for recreational
athletic competition or instruction for participants who are under the age of 19 years.
(b) (1) A youth sports program shall make available information on
concussions, head injuries, and sudden cardiac arrest developed by the State Department
of Education under §§ 7–433 and 7–436 of the Education Article to coaches, youth athletes,
and the parents or guardians of youth athletes.
(2) A coach of a youth sports program shall review the information provided
in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.